Utah statutes.
73-4-24.   Dispute involving rights of less than all parties to general suit
-- Petition -- Notice -- Hearing and determination -- Interlocutory decree.
If, during the pendency of a general adjudication suit, there shall be a
dispute involving the water rights of less than all of the parties to such
suit, any interested party may petition the district court in which the
general adjudication suit is pending to hear and determine said dispute. All
persons who have a direct interest in said dispute shall be given such notice
as is required by order of the district court and in addition thereto the
district court shall require that notice of the initial hearing on said
dispute be given by publication at least once each week for two successive
weeks in newspapers reasonably calculated to give notice to all water users on
the system. Thereafter the court may hear and determine the dispute and may
enter an interlocutory decree to control the rights of the parties, unless
modified or reversed on appeal, until the final decree in the general
adjudication suit is entered. At that time the district court may after
hearing make such modifications in the interlocutory decree as are necessary
to fit it into the final decree without conflict.
